New Jersey, session 222, S2724.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The following item and language provision in section 1 of P.L.2025, c.74, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, are amended as follows: 54 DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 53 Economic Assistance and Security 7550 Division of Family Development GRANTS-IN-AID 15-7550  Income Maintenance Management [$616,711,000] $644,711,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Division of Family Development [$616,711,000] $644,711,000 Grants-in-Aid: 15    Work First New Jersey Child Care [($565,805,000)] ($593,805,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 2 of P.L.1993, c.46 (C.30:5B-31) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, [of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Work First New Jersey Child Care and for the avoidance of doubt,] the Commissioner of Human Services[, in consultation with the Division of Family Development, is authorized to pause or terminate acceptance of applications for child care assistance in the event that projected program expenditures exceed the amount hereinabove appropriated for Work First New Jersey Child Care, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting; provided, however, that in the event that sufficient funding is determined to be available, applications received during the time period that enrollment is reopened, as determined by the Director of the Division of Family Development, shall be prioritized in the following order: (1) families at or below 100% of the federal poverty level; (2) Temporary Assistance for Needy Families children; (3) children under the auspices of Child Protective Services; (4) children with special needs/disabilities, and (5) all other children.] shall 1) discontinue any pause in the processing of applications for child care assistance and approve eligibility for any applicant who meets standards that are no more rigorous than the eligibility criteria in place on June 30, 2025; and 2) implement family copayments for child care assistance which are no more than those family copayments in place on June 30, 2025. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.